Utah statutes.
40-1-2.   Discovery monument -- Notice of location -- Contents.

The locator at the time of making the discovery of such vein or lode must erect a monument at the place of discovery, and post thereon his notice of location which shall contain:

(1)  The name of the claim.

(2)  The name of the locator or locators.

(3)  The date of the location.

(4)  If a lode claim, the number of linear feet claimed in length along the course of the vein each way from the point of discovery, with the width claimed on each side of the center of the vein, and the general course of the vein or lode as near as may be, and such a description of the claim, located by reference to some natural object or permanent monument, as will identify the claim.

(5)  If a placer or mill site claim, the number of acres or superficial feet claimed, and such a description of the claim or mill site, located by reference to some natural object or permanent monument, as will identify the claim or mill site.

